Nebraska, session 109, LB283.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB283 LB283
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 68-901, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
68-901 Sections 68-901 to 68-9,111 and section 2 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Medical Assistance Act.
Sec. 2. (1) No later than October 1, 2025, the department shall
submit applications to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services to amend the medicaid state plan and Children's Health Insurance
Program state plan to implement express lane eligibility in accordance
with 42 U.S.C. 1396a(e)(13).
(2) The state plan amendments shall identify the Division of
Children and Family Services of the department as an express lane agency
which shall use data from the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program
for express lane eligibility determinations. The state plan amendments
shall also specify that the express lane eligibility option will be used
for initial eligibility determinations, redeterminations, automatic
enrollment, and automatic renewals for eligible children in the medical
assistance program and the Children's Health Insurance Program
established pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 1397aa et seq.
(3) The applications to amend the medicaid state plan and the
Children's Health Insurance Program state plan shall have an effective
date for implementation of express lane eligibility no later than January
1, 2026.
(4) The department shall take all actions necessary to maximize
federal financial participation to carry out this section.
Sec. 3. Original section 68-901, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-2-